Hawaii statutes.
§26-39 Department staffs. Except as
otherwise provided by this chapter and with the approval of the governor, the
head of a department may establish or abolish any subordinate office or
position, transfer officers and employees between positions, appoint and remove
any subordinate, and change the duties, titles, and compensation of offices and
positions as is deemed necessary by the head of the department for the
efficient functioning of the department, subject to the limitations of
available appropriations and of the provisions of chapter 76.

All officers and employees within a department
shall be under the supervision, direction and control of the head of the
department, except as otherwise provided by this chapter. [L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§8; Supp, §14A-6; HRS §26-39; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Attorney General Opinions

Positions of chief of harbors division and chief of
aeronautics division created under this section are covered by chapters 76 and
77. Att. Gen. Op. 62-27.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next